Alaska statutes. Title 19. Highways and Ferries.
Article 1. Establishment and Organization.

Sec. 19.75.011.
Purpose.

The purpose of the authority created by this chapter is to develop, stimulate, and advance the economic welfare of the state and further the development of public transportation systems in the vicinity of the Upper Cook Inlet with operation and management of a bridge to span Knik Arm and connect the Municipality of Anchorage and the Matanuska-Susitna Borough.

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.90.011. Renumbered in 2003.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, substituted “operation and management of a bridge” for “construction of a bridge”.

Sec. 19.75.021.
Establishment of authority.

There is established the Knik Arm Bridge and Toll Authority. The authority is a public corporation and an instrumentality of the state within the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, but the authority has a separate and independent legal existence from the state. The exercise by the authority of the powers in this chapter is considered an essential governmental function of the state.

The authority may not be terminated as long as it has notes or other obligations outstanding, including obligations under an agreement with the state as provided in AS

37.15.225

. Upon termination of the authority, its rights and property pass to the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 2003; am § 3 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.90.021. Renumbered in 2003.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, in (b), rewrote the first sentence, which read, “The authority may not be terminated as long as it has bonds, notes, or other obligations outstanding.”

Sec. 19.75.031.
Board of directors of authority.

The authority shall be governed by a board of directors consisting of the following:

the commissioner of transportation and public facilities or the commissioner’s designee;

the commissioner of revenue or the commissioner’s designee;

one public member, appointed by the governor, who is a state resident and United States citizen;

one public member, appointed by the governor, who is a resident of the Municipality of Anchorage and who has knowledge of local transportation issues;

one public member, appointed by the governor, who is a resident of the Matanuska-Susitna Borough and who has knowledge of local transportation issues;

one nonvoting member who is a member of the state house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house and who serves at the pleasure of the speaker of the house; the speaker of the house shall consider the appointment of a legislator elected from a house district that lies entirely or partially within the Municipality of Anchorage or the Matanuska-Susitna Borough for appointment under this paragraph; and

one nonvoting member who is a member of the state senate appointed by the president of the senate and who serves at the pleasure of the president of the senate; the president of the senate shall consider the appointment of a senator elected from a senate district that lies entirely or partially within the Municipality of Anchorage or the Matanuska-Susitna Borough for appointment under this paragraph.

The public members of the board shall serve for staggered terms of five years and may be reappointed to a single successive five-year term. A public member may only be removed for cause.

If a vacancy occurs in a public member’s seat on the board, the governor shall make an appointment, effective immediately, for the unexpired portion of that member’s term.

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.90.031. Renumbered in 2003.

Sec. 19.75.041.
Operation of authority.

The powers of the authority are vested in the board.

Three voting members of the board constitute a quorum.

The governor shall designate one member of the board to serve as the chair of the board. The voting members of the board shall elect other officers they determine desirable.

Action may be taken and motions and resolutions adopted by the board at a meeting by the affirmative vote of at least three voting members.

The public members of the board shall receive a stipend of $300 a day while performing business of the authority.

The members of the board serving under AS

19.75.031(a)(1)

, (2), (6), and (7) serve without compensation but are entitled to per diem and travel expenses authorized by law under AS

39.20.180

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.90.041. Renumbered in 2003, at which time “AS

19.75.031(a)(1)

, (2), (6), and (7)” was substituted for “AS 44.90.031 (a)(1), (2), (6), and (7)” to reflect the 2003 renumbering of AS 44.90.031.

Sec. 19.75.051.
Executive director.

The authority shall employ an executive director who may not be a member of the board. The executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the board. The board shall establish the duties and compensation of the executive director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.90.051. Renumbered in 2003.

Sec. 19.75.061.
Employment of personnel.

The executive director may hire employees of the authority. The board shall prescribe the duties and compensation of authority employees.

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.90.061. Renumbered in 2003.

Sec. 19.75.071.
Personnel exempt from State Personnel Act.

The executive director and employees of the authority are in the exempt service under AS 39.25 (State Personnel Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.90.071. Renumbered in 2003.

Sec. 19.75.076.
Application of the Executive Budget Act.

The operating budget of the authority is subject to AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act).

History.

(§ 4 ch 51 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 15, ch. 51, SLA 2014 makes this section effective July 1, 2014.

Sec. 19.75.081.
Legal advisor.

The attorney general is the legal counsel for the authority. The attorney general shall advise the authority in legal matters and represent it in suits.

History.

(§ 1 ch 77 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 44.90.081. Renumbered in 2003.